hunspell/kk_KZ.modified.aff
SFX p N 52
SFX p бу птім [әеёиөүіюя]бу sf:птім:2
SFX p бу птым [аоуұыэ]бу sf:птым:2
SFX p гу ктім [әеёиөүіюя]гу sf:ктім:2
SFX p ғу ктім [әеёиөүіюя]ғу sf:ктім:2
SFX p гу ктым [аоуұыэ]гу sf:ктым:2
SFX p ғу қтым [аоуұыэ]ғу sf:қтым:2
SFX p ду ттім [әеёиөүіюя]ду sf:ттім:2
SFX p ду ттым [аоуұыэ]ду sf:ттым:2
SFX p у дім [әеёиөүіюя]жу sf:дім:1
SFX p у дім [әеёиөүіюя]зу sf:дім:1
SFX p у дім [әеёиөүіюя]лу sf:дім:1
SFX p у дім [әеёиөүіюя]му sf:дім:1
SFX p у дім [әеёиөүіюя]ну sf:дім:1
SFX p у дім [әеёиөүіюя]ңу sf:дім:1
SFX p у дім [әеёиөүіюя]ру sf:дім:1
SFX p у дым [аоуұыэ]жу sf:дым:1
SFX p у дым [аоуұыэ]зу sf:дым:1
SFX p у дым [аоуұыэ]лу sf:дым:1
SFX p у дым [аоуұыэ]му sf:дым:1
SFX p у дым [аоуұыэ]ну sf:дым:1
SFX p у дым [аоуұыэ]ңу sf:дым:1
SFX p у дым [аоуұыэ]ру sf:дым:1
SFX p у дым [аоуұыэ]у sf:дым:1
SFX p у дым [әеёиөүіюя]у sf:дым:1
SFX p у тім [әеёиөүіюя]ву sf:тім:1
SFX p у тім [әеёиөүіюя]ку sf:тім:1
SFX p у тім [әеёиөүіюя]қу sf:тім:1
SFX p у тім [әеёиөүіюя]һу sf:тім:1
SFX p у тім [әеёиөүіюя]пу sf:тім:1
SFX p у тім [әеёиөүіюя]су sf:тім:1
SFX p у тім [әеёиөүіюя]ту sf:тім:1
SFX p у тім [әеёиөүіюя]фу sf:тім:1
SFX p у тім [әеёиөүіюя]ху sf:тім:1
SFX p у тім [әеёиөүіюя]цу sf:тім:1
SFX p у тім [әеёиөүіюя]чу sf:тім:1
SFX p у тім [әеёиөүіюя]шу sf:тім:1
SFX p у тім [әеёиөүіюя]щу sf:тім:1
SFX p у тым [аоуұыэ]ву sf:тым:1
SFX p у тым [аоуұыэ]ку sf:тым:1
SFX p у тым [аоуұыэ]қу sf:тым:1
SFX p у тым [аоуұыэ]һу sf:тым:1
SFX p у тым [аоуұыэ]пу sf:тым:1
SFX p у тым [аоуұыэ]су sf:тым:1
SFX p у тым [аоуұыэ]ту sf:тым:1
SFX p у тым [аоуұыэ]фу sf:тым:1
SFX p у тым [аоуұыэ]ху sf:тым:1
SFX p у тым [аоуұыэ]цу sf:тым:1
SFX p у тым [аоуұыэ]чу sf:тым:1
SFX p у тым [аоуұыэ]шу sf:тым:1
SFX p у тым [аоуұыэ]щу sf:тым:1
SFX p ю йдім [әеёиөүіюя]ю sf:йдім:1
SFX p ю йдым [аоуұыэ]ю sf:йдым:1
SFX Q N 52
SFX Q бу птік [әеёиөүіюя]бу sf:птік:2
SFX Q бу птық [аоуұыэ]бу sf:птық:2
SFX Q гу ктік [әеёиөүіюя]гу sf:ктік:2
SFX Q ғу ктік [әеёиөүіюя]ғу sf:ктік:2
SFX Q гу ктық [аоуұыэ]гу sf:ктық:2
SFX Q ғу қтық [аоуұыэ]ғу sf:қтық:2
SFX Q ду ттік [әеёиөүіюя]ду sf:ттік:2
SFX Q ду ттық [аоуұыэ]ду sf:ттық:2
SFX Q у дік [әеёиөүіюя]жу sf:дік:1
SFX Q у дік [әеёиөүіюя]зу sf:дік:1
SFX Q у дік [әеёиөүіюя]лу sf:дік:1
SFX Q у дік [әеёиөүіюя]му sf:дік:1
SFX Q у дік [әеёиөүіюя]ну sf:дік:1
SFX Q у дік [әеёиөүіюя]ңу sf:дік:1
SFX Q у дік [әеёиөүіюя]ру sf:дік:1
SFX Q у дық [аоуұыэ]жу sf:дық:1
SFX Q у дық [аоуұыэ]зу sf:дық:1
SFX Q у дық [аоуұыэ]лу sf:дық:1
SFX Q у дық [аоуұыэ]му sf:дық:1
SFX Q у дық [аоуұыэ]ну sf:дық:1
SFX Q у дық [аоуұыэ]ңу sf:дық:1
SFX Q у дық [аоуұыэ]ру sf:дық:1
SFX Q у дық [аоуұыэ]у sf:дық:1
SFX Q у дық [әеёиөүіюя]у sf:дық:1
SFX Q у тік [әеёиөүіюя]ву sf:тік:1
SFX Q у тік [әеёиөүіюя]ку sf:тік:1
SFX Q у тік [әеёиөүіюя]қу sf:тік:1
SFX Q у тік [әеёиөүіюя]һу sf:тік:1
SFX Q у тік [әеёиөүіюя]пу sf:тік:1
SFX Q у тік [әеёиөүіюя]су sf:тік:1
SFX Q у тік [әеёиөүіюя]ту sf:тік:1
SFX Q у тік [әеёиөүіюя]фу sf:тік:1
SFX Q у тік [әеёиөүіюя]ху sf:тік:1
SFX Q у тік [әеёиөүіюя]цу sf:тік:1
SFX Q у тік [әеёиөүіюя]чу sf:тік:1
SFX Q у тік [әеёиөүіюя]шу sf:тік:1
SFX Q у тік [әеёиөүіюя]щу sf:тік:1
SFX Q у тық [аоуұыэ]ву sf:тық:1
SFX Q у тық [аоуұыэ]ку sf:тық:1
SFX Q у тық [аоуұыэ]қу sf:тық:1
SFX Q у тық [аоуұыэ]һу sf:тық:1
SFX Q у тық [аоуұыэ]пу sf:тық:1
SFX Q у тық [аоуұыэ]су sf:тық:1
SFX Q у тық [аоуұыэ]ту sf:тық:1
SFX Q у тық [аоуұыэ]фу sf:тық:1
SFX Q у тық [аоуұыэ]ху sf:тық:1
SFX Q у тық [аоуұыэ]цу sf:тық:1
SFX Q у тық [аоуұыэ]чу sf:тық:1
SFX Q у тық [аоуұыэ]шу sf:тық:1
SFX Q у тық [аоуұыэ]щу sf:тық:1
SFX Q ю йдік [әеёиөүіюя]ю sf:йдік:1
SFX Q ю йдық [аоуұыэ]ю sf:йдық:1
SFX q N 52
SFX q бу птің [әеёиөүіюя]бу sf:птің:2
SFX q бу птың [аоуұыэ]бу sf:птың:2
SFX q гу ктің [әеёиөүіюя]гу sf:ктің:2
SFX q ғу ктің [әеёиөүіюя]ғу sf:ктің:2
SFX q гу ктың [аоуұыэ]гу sf:ктың:2
SFX q ғу қтың [аоуұыэ]ғу sf:қтың:2
SFX q ду ттің [әеёиөүіюя]ду sf:ттің:2
SFX q ду ттың [аоуұыэ]ду sf:ттың:2
SFX q у дің [әеёиөүіюя]жу sf:дің:1
SFX q у дің [әеёиөүіюя]зу sf:дің:1
SFX q у дің [әеёиөүіюя]лу sf:дің:1
SFX q у дің [әеёиөүіюя]му sf:дің:1
SFX q у дің [әеёиөүіюя]ну sf:дің:1
SFX q у дің [әеёиөүіюя]ңу sf:дің:1
SFX q у дің [әеёиөүіюя]ру sf:дің:1
SFX q у дың [аоуұыэ]жу sf:дың:1
SFX q у дың [аоуұыэ]зу sf:дың:1
SFX q у дың [аоуұыэ]лу sf:дың:1
SFX q у дың [аоуұыэ]му sf:дың:1
SFX q у дың [аоуұыэ]ну sf:дың:1
SFX q у дың [аоуұыэ]ңу sf:дың:1
SFX q у дың [аоуұыэ]ру sf:дың:1
SFX q у дың [аоуұыэ]у sf:дың:1
SFX q у дың [әеёиөүіюя]у sf:дың:1
SFX q у тің [әеёиөүіюя]ву sf:тің:1
SFX q у тің [әеёиөүіюя]ку sf:тің:1
SFX q у тің [әеёиөүіюя]қу sf:тің:1
SFX q у тің [әеёиөүіюя]һу sf:тің:1
SFX q у тің [әеёиөүіюя]пу sf:тің:1
SFX q у тің [әеёиөүіюя]су sf:тің:1
SFX q у тің [әеёиөүіюя]ту sf:тің:1
SFX q у тің [әеёиөүіюя]фу sf:тің:1
SFX q у тің [әеёиөүіюя]ху sf:тің:1
SFX q у тің [әеёиөүіюя]цу sf:тің:1
SFX q у тің [әеёиөүіюя]чу sf:тің:1
SFX q у тің [әеёиөүіюя]шу sf:тің:1
SFX q у тің [әеёиөүіюя]щу sf:тің:1
SFX q у тың [аоуұыэ]ву sf:тың:1
SFX q у тың [аоуұыэ]ку sf:тың:1
SFX q у тың [аоуұыэ]қу sf:тың:1
SFX q у тың [аоуұыэ]һу sf:тың:1
SFX q у тың [аоуұыэ]пу sf:тың:1
SFX q у тың [аоуұыэ]су sf:тың:1
SFX q у тың [аоуұыэ]ту sf:тың:1
SFX q у тың [аоуұыэ]фу sf:тың:1
SFX q у тың [аоуұыэ]ху sf:тың:1
SFX q у тың [аоуұыэ]цу sf:тың:1
SFX q у тың [аоуұыэ]чу sf:тың:1
SFX q у тың [аоуұыэ]шу sf:тың:1
SFX q у тың [аоуұыэ]щу sf:тың:1
SFX q ю йдің [әеёиөүіюя]ю sf:йдің:1
SFX q ю йдың [аоуұыэ]ю sf:йдың:1
SFX R N 52
SFX R бу птіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]бу sf:птіңдер:2
SFX R бу птыңдар [аоуұыэ]бу sf:птыңдар:2
SFX R гу ктіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]гу sf:ктіңдер:2
SFX R ғу ктіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]ғу sf:ктіңдер:2
SFX R гу ктыңдар [аоуұыэ]гу sf:ктыңдар:2
SFX R ғу қтыңдар [аоуұыэ]ғу sf:қтыңдар:2
SFX R ду ттіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]ду sf:ттіңдер:2
SFX R ду ттыңдар [аоуұыэ]ду sf:ттыңдар:2
SFX R у діңдер [әеёиөүіюя]жу sf:діңдер:1
SFX R у діңдер [әеёиөүіюя]зу sf:діңдер:1
SFX R у діңдер [әеёиөүіюя]лу sf:діңдер:1
SFX R у діңдер [әеёиөүіюя]му sf:діңдер:1
SFX R у діңдер [әеёиөүіюя]ну sf:діңдер:1
SFX R у діңдер [әеёиөүіюя]ңу sf:діңдер:1
SFX R у діңдер [әеёиөүіюя]ру sf:діңдер:1
SFX R у дыңдар [аоуұыэ]жу sf:дыңдар:1
SFX R у дыңдар [аоуұыэ]зу sf:дыңдар:1
SFX R у дыңдар [аоуұыэ]лу sf:дыңдар:1
SFX R у дыңдар [аоуұыэ]му sf:дыңдар:1
SFX R у дыңдар [аоуұыэ]ну sf:дыңдар:1
SFX R у дыңдар [аоуұыэ]ңу sf:дыңдар:1
SFX R у дыңдар [аоуұыэ]ру sf:дыңдар:1
SFX R у дыңдар [аоуұыэ]у sf:дыңдар:1
SFX R у дыңдар [әеёиөүіюя]у sf:дыңдар:1
SFX R у тіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]ву sf:тіңдер:1
SFX R у тіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]ку sf:тіңдер:1
SFX R у тіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]қу sf:тіңдер:1
SFX R у тіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]һу sf:тіңдер:1
SFX R у тіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]пу sf:тіңдер:1
SFX R у тіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]су sf:тіңдер:1
SFX R у тіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]ту sf:тіңдер:1
SFX R у тіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]фу sf:тіңдер:1
SFX R у тіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]ху sf:тіңдер:1
SFX R у тіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]цу sf:тіңдер:1
SFX R у тіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]чу sf:тіңдер:1
SFX R у тіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]шу sf:тіңдер:1
SFX R у тіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]щу sf:тіңдер:1
SFX R у тыңдар [аоуұыэ]ву sf:тыңдар:1
SFX R у тыңдер [аоуұыэ]ку sf:тыңдер:1
SFX R у тыңдер [аоуұыэ]қу sf:тыңдер:1
SFX R у тыңдер [аоуұыэ]һу sf:тыңдер:1
SFX R у тыңдер [аоуұыэ]пу sf:тыңдер:1
SFX R у тыңдер [аоуұыэ]су sf:тыңдер:1
SFX R у тыңдер [аоуұыэ]ту sf:тыңдер:1
SFX R у тыңдер [аоуұыэ]фу sf:тыңдер:1
SFX R у тыңдер [аоуұыэ]ху sf:тыңдер:1
SFX R у тыңдер [аоуұыэ]цу sf:тыңдер:1
SFX R у тыңдер [аоуұыэ]чу sf:тыңдер:1
SFX R у тыңдер [аоуұыэ]шу sf:тыңдер:1
SFX R у тыңдер [аоуұыэ]щу sf:тыңдер:1
SFX R ю йдіндер [әеёиөүіюя]ю sf:йдіндер:1
SFX R ю йдыңдар [аоуұыэ]ю sf:йдыңдар:1
