hunspell/kk_KZ.modified.dic
азаю/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
айықтыру/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
алдау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
анталау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
арсалану/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
асу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
аудармалау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
ашуланбау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
ағуалау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
аңғырттану/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
байқастау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
барбаңдау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
баталасу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
бағдарлану/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
безерлеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
белдеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
биіктеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
борасындау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
боталау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
буыну/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
бырығу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
бірнешеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
бүлкілдеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
бұлалау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
бұралаңдау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
бұқпалақтау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
бөлеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
гүрсілдеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
дарылдау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
деректану/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
дуалау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
дүрдию/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
дәусіну/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
елбеңдеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
енбау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
еру/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
еңкілдеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
жайнақтау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
жампаңдау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
жасыру/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
желігу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
жуу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
жұлқыну/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
зораю/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
итшілеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
кекеңдеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
кескектеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
кідірту/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
күлдірлеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
кәңгіру/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
көріну/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
маймию/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
манаурану/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
маужырау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
мейірлену/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
моделдеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
мықию/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
мұздаңқырау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
настау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
ойқылдану/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
отау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
паралату/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
реттеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
самарқау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
саябырсу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
семсерлесу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
сойғылау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
сусу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
сыптию/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
сіргелеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
сұлулау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
тайпию/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
тарау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
тереңдеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
толымдау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
топшылау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
тотығу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
тулау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
тыныштату/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
тығылту/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
тілену/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
түйдіру/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
түктеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
түрілу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
тұзсырау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
тұтамдау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
төбелестіру/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
төрткілдеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
уәждесу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
шайлау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
шалғайлау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
шапылдасу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
шатылысу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
шақтату/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
шелдендіру/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
шилықтыру/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
шорлау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
шумақтану/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
шүңірею/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
ыбылжу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
ытырылу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
іріту/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қаймию/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қалғу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қарамықтану/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қарулану/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қатыбастану/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қашақтау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қаңғу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қиқарсу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қолдану/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қоруылдау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қоқырақтау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қырмалау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қысқарту/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
құйқылжу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
құру/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
үйшіктелу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
үстелу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
ұлтару/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
әбзелдеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
өктемсу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
